West Virginia, session 2025, HB2275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Highways. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22-18-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Highways (transportation of hazardous wastes upon the roads and highways, 157 CSR 07), is authorized.